Utah statutes.
31A-38-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Bridge program" means the program established by the Department of Workforce Services on July 1, 2003:

(a)  to implement the federal health coverage tax credit program;

(b)  with federal funds; and

(c)  for qualified participants.

(2)  "Federal health coverage tax credit program" means the health care tax credit program authorized by the Trade Reform Act.

(3)  "Qualified participant" means an individual:

(a)  eligible for coverage under the state program in accordance with Section 31A-38-103; and

(b)  qualified by the Internal Revenue Service and the Department of the United States Treasury to participate in the federal health coverage tax credit program.

(4)  "State program" means the program established under this chapter:

(a)  to implement the federal health coverage tax credit program; and

(b)  for qualified participants.

(5)  "Trade Reform Act" means the Trade Adjustment Assistance Reform Act of 2002, 107 P.L. 210.

